Arkansas statutes. Constitution Of The State Of Arkansas Of 1874
AMEND. 98. ARKANSAS MEDICAL MARIJUANA AMENDMENT OF 2016.
§
8. Licensing of dispensaries and cultivation facilities.

Dispensaries and cultivation facilities shall be licensed by the Medical Marijuana Commission.

The commission shall administer and regulate the licensing of dispensaries and cultivation facilities, including the issuance of a:

License to operate a dispensary; and

License to operate a cultivation facility.

The Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall administer and enforce the provisions of this amendment concerning dispensaries and cultivation facilities.

The commission and division shall each adopt rules necessary to:

Carry out the purposes of this amendment; and

Perform its duties under this amendment.

Rules adopted under this section are rules as defined in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

The following individuals associated with a dispensary or cultivation facility shall be current residents of Arkansas who have resided in the state for the previous seven (7) consecutive years:

The individual(s) submitting an application to license a dispensary or cultivation facility; and,

Sixty percent (60%) of the individuals owning an interest in a dispensary or cultivation facility.

Not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the effective date of this amendment, the commission shall adopt rules governing:

The manner in which the commission considers applications for and renewals of licenses for dispensaries and cultivation facilities;

The form and content of registration and renewal applications for dispensaries and cultivation facilities; and

Any other matters necessary for the commission's fair, impartial, stringent, and comprehensive administration of this amendment.

Not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the effective date of this amendment, the division shall adopt rules governing:

Oversight requirements for dispensaries and cultivation facilities;

Recordkeeping requirements for dispensaries and cultivation facilities;

Security requirements for dispensaries and cultivation facilities;

Personnel requirements for dispensaries and cultivation facilities;

The manufacture, processing, packaging, labeling, and dispensing of usable marijuana to qualifying patients and designated caregivers, including without limitation:

Before sale, food or drink that has been combined with usable marijuana shall not exceed ten milligrams (10 mg) of active tetrahydrocannabinol per portion and shall be physically demarked; and

If portions cannot be physically determined, the entirety of the food or drink that has been combined with usable marijuana shall not contain more than ten milligrams (10 mg) of active tetrahydrocannabinol;

Procedures for suspending or terminating the licenses of dispensaries and cultivation facilities that violate the provisions of this amendment or the rules adopted under this amendment, procedures for appealing penalties, and a schedule of penalties;

Procedures for inspections and investigations of dispensaries and cultivation facilities;

Advertising restrictions for dispensaries and cultivation facilities, including without limitation the advertising, marketing, packaging, and promotion of dispensaries and cultivation facilities with the purpose to avoid making the product of a dispensary or a cultivation facility appealing to children, including without limitation:

Artwork;

Building signage;

Product design, including without limitation shapes and flavors;

Child-proof packaging that cannot be opened by a child or that prevents ready access to toxic or harmful amount of the product, and that meets the testing requirements in accordance with the method described in 16 C.F.R. § 1700.20, as existing on January 1, 2017;

Indoor displays that can be seen from outside the dispensary or cultivation facility; and

Other forms of marketing related to medical marijuana;

Procedures for the disposal or other use of marijuana not dispensed to a qualifying patient; and

Any other matters necessary to the division's fair, impartial, stringent, and comprehensive administration of its duties under this amendment.

Not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the effective date of this amendment, the commission shall adopt rules establishing license application and license renewal fees for dispensary and cultivation facility licenses.

The initial dispensary application fee shall be a maximum of seven thousand five hundred dollars ($7,500).

The initial cultivation facility application fee shall be a maximum of fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

A license that is initially issued between January 1 and July 1 may have the licensing fees up to fifty percent (50%) prorated and refunded as determined by the commission.

Not later than July 1, 2017, the commission shall begin accepting applications for licenses to operate a dispensary and cultivation facility.

The application shall include without limitation the following:

The application fee;

The legal name of the dispensary or cultivation facility;

The physical address of the:

Dispensary, the location of which may not be within one thousand five hundred feet (1,500') of a public or private school, church, daycare center, or facility for individuals with developmental disabilities, existing before the date of the dispensary application, which shall be calculated from the primary entrance of the dispensary to the nearest property boundary of a public or private school, church, daycare center, or facility for individuals with developmental disabilities.

Subdivision (g)(2)(C)(i)(a) of this section does not apply to or impact existing locations of dispensaries issued a license before the effective date of this subdivision (g)(2)(C)(i)(b) that may be located within one thousand five hundred feet (1,500') of a facility for individuals with developmental disabilities; or

Cultivation facility, the location of which may not be within three thousand feet (3,000') of a public or private school, church, or daycare center existing before the date of the cultivation facility application, which shall be calculated from the primary entrance of the cultivation facility to the nearest property boundary of a public or private school, church, or daycare center;

The name, address, and date of birth of each dispensary agent or cultivation facility agent; and

If the city, town, or county in which the dispensary or cultivation facility would be located has enacted zoning restrictions, a sworn statement certifying that the dispensary or cultivation facility will operate in compliance with the restrictions.

The commission shall issue at least twenty (20) but no more than forty (40) dispensary licenses.

There shall be no more than four (4) dispensaries in any one (1) county.

The commission shall issue at least four (4) but no more than eight (8) cultivation facility licenses.

The commission shall conduct a criminal background check in order to carry out this section.

The commission shall require each applicant for a dispensary license or cultivation facility license to apply for or authorize the commission to obtain state and national criminal background checks to be conducted by the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

The criminal background checks shall conform to the applicable federal standards and shall include the taking of fingerprints.

The applicant shall authorize the release of the criminal background checks to the commission and shall be responsible for the payment of any fee associated with the criminal background checks.

Upon completion of the criminal background checks, the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall forward to the commission all information obtained concerning the applicant.

No individual shall own an interest in more than:

One (1) dispensary.

A dispensary licensed under this section may acquire, possess, manufacture, process, prepare, deliver, transfer, transport, supply, and dispense marijuana, marijuana paraphernalia, and related supplies and educational materials to a qualifying patient or designated caregiver, but shall not supply, possess, manufacture, deliver, transfer, or sell marijuana paraphernalia that requires the combustion of marijuana to be properly utilized, including pipes, water pipes, bongs, chillums, rolling papers, and roach clips.

A dispensary licensed under this section shall:

Make marijuana vaporizers available for sale to qualifying patients; and

Provide educational materials about medical marijuana methods of ingestion to qualifying patients and designated caregivers, including without limitation:

Warnings on the potential health risks of smoking or combusting marijuana; and

Information on potential health benefits of vaporizing marijuana compared to smoking or combusting.

A dispensary may receive compensation for providing the goods and services allowed by this section.

A dispensary may contract with a transporter, distributer, or processer to extent of the license of the transporter, distributer, or processer.

A dispensary may grow or possess:

Fifty (50) mature marijuana plants at any one (1) time plus seedlings; and

All usable marijuana derived from the plants under subdivision (m)(3)(A)(i) of this section or predecessor plants.

A dispensary may contract with a cultivation facility to cultivate one (1) or more mature marijuana plants the dispensary is permitted to grow.

A cultivation facility may cultivate and possess usable marijuana in an amount reasonably necessary to meet the demand for the needs of qualifying patients as determined by the commission with the assistance of the Department of Health.

However, a cultivation facility shall not sell marijuana in any form except to a dispensary or other cultivation facility.

A cultivation facility may also possess marijuana seeds.

The commission with the assistance of the Department of Health shall promulgate rules determining the amount of marijuana reasonably necessary under subdivision (m)(4)(A) of this section.

A cultivation facility may receive compensation for providing goods and services allowed by this section.

A cultivation facility may contract with a transporter, distributer, or processer to extent of the license of the transporter, distributer, or processer.

A dispensary license and cultivation facility license shall expire on June 30 of each calendar year and are renewable on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.

The commission shall issue a renewal dispensary license or a renewal cultivation facility license within ten (10) days to any entity who complies with the requirements contained in this amendment, including without limitation the payment of a renewal fee.

The commission may charge a reasonable fee as established by rule for the issuance of a renewal license.

The commission and the division may collect fines or fees for any violation of a rule adopted under this section.

A license for a dispensary or cultivation facility shall only be issued to a natural person.

A license issued for a dispensary or cultivation facility shall be transferable only to a natural person upon approval of the commission.

Data or records submitted to the division or commission under rules adopted under this amendment may be shared with the Department of Health and the State Insurance Department for purposes of the Arkansas all-payer claims database established under the Arkansas Healthcare Transparency Initiative Act of 2015, § 23-61-901 et seq.

A dispensary shall appoint a pharmacist consultant who is a pharmacist licensed with the Arkansas State Board of Pharmacy.

A pharmacist consultant shall:

Register as a dispensary agent under this amendment and follow all procedures;

Develop and provide training to other dispensary agents at least one (1) time every twelve (12) months from the initial date of the opening of the dispensary on the following subjects:

Guidelines for providing information to qualifying patients related to risks, benefits, and side effects associated with medical marijuana;

Recognizing the signs and symptoms of substance abuse; and

Guidelines for refusing to provide medical marijuana to an individual who appears to be impaired or abusing medical marijuana;

Assist in the development and implementation of review and improvement processes for patient education and support provided by the dispensary;

Provide oversight for the development and dissemination of:

Education materials for qualifying patients and designated caregivers that include:

Information about possible side effects and contraindications of medical marijuana;

Guidelines for notifying the physician who provided the written certification for medical marijuana if side effects or contraindications occur;

A description of the potential effects of differing strengths of medical marijuana strains and products;

Information about potential drug-to-drug interactions, including interactions with alcohol, prescription drugs, nonprescription drugs, and supplements;

Techniques for the use of medical marijuana and marijuana paraphernalia; and

Information about different methods, forms, and routes of medical marijuana administration;

Systems for documentation by a qualifying patient or designated caregiver of the symptoms of a qualifying patient that includes a logbook, rating scale for pain and symptoms, and guidelines for a patient's self-assessment; and

Policies and procedures for refusing to provide medical marijuana to an individual who appears to be impaired or abusing medical marijuana; and

Be accessible to the dispensary or dispensary agent through:

Telephonic means at all times during operating hours; and

Telephone or video conference for a patient consultation during operating hours.

A cultivation facility shall meet the following security requirements:

The physical security controls set forth in 21 C.F.R. § 1301.72 — 1301.74, as existing on January 1, 2017.

The division shall adopt rules to implement subdivision (t)(1)(A)(i) of this section;

All cultivation of marijuana occurs within a building, greenhouse, or other structure that:

Has a complete roof enclosure supported by connecting walls that are constructed of solid material extending from the ground to the roof;

Is secure against unauthorized entry;

Has a foundation, slab, or equivalent base to which the floor is securely attached;

Meets performance standards ensuring that cultivation and processing activities cannot be and are not perceptible from the structure in terms of:

Common visual observation;

Odors, smells, fragrances, or other olfactory stimuli;

Light pollution, glare, or brightness;

Adequate ventilation to prevent mold; and

Noise;

Provides complete visual screening; and

Is accessible only through one (1) or more lockable doors;

Current detailed plans and elevation drawings of all operational areas involved with the production of medical marijuana are maintained on the premises of the cultivation facility, including:

All storage areas, ventilation systems, and equipment used for production;

All entrances and exits to the cultivation facility;

All windows, skylights, and retractable mechanisms built into the roof;

The location of all required security cameras;

The location of all alarm inputs, detectors, and sirens;

All video and alarm system surveillance areas;

All production areas labeled according to the specific activity occurring within the area;

All restricted and limited access areas identified; and

All nonproduction areas labeled according to purpose;

Access to areas where marijuana is grown, harvested, processed, and stored is limited to authorized personnel and:

Designated by clearly marked signage; and

Locked and accessible only by authorized personnel on a current roster of authorized personnel;

Written policies regarding any nonregistered agent who may visit the premises and a log of all visitors to the premises are developed and maintained.

The log shall consist of the visitor's name, purpose of visit, time of arrival, and time of departure.

Visitors to a cultivation facility shall be:

Issued a visitor identification tag containing the visitor's name that shall be worn for the duration of the visit on the premises; and

Escorted by a cultivation facility agent at all times while present on the premises.

However, contractors conducting repairs, maintenance, or other specific duties may be escorted to their work site and left unaccompanied while completing a job.

Cultivation facility agents shall ensure that the contractor and area under repair are under video surveillance for the duration of the time spent on the premises by the contractor; and

An alarm system is equipped that upon attempted unauthorized entry, transmits a signal directly to a central protection company for a local or state police agency and a designated cultivation facility agent.

The alarm system shall:

Provide coverage for all points of ingress and egress to the cultivation facility, including without limitation doorways, windows, loading bays, skylights, and retractable roof mechanisms;

Provide coverage of any room with an exterior wall, any room containing a safe, and any room used to grow or store medical marijuana;

Be equipped with a panic drive that upon activation will not only sound any audible alarm components but will also notify law enforcement;

Have duress and hold up features to enable a cultivation facility agent to activate a silent alarm notifying law enforcement of an emergency;

Be equipped with failure notification systems to notify cultivation facilities and law enforcement of any failure in the alarm system; and

Have the ability to remain operational during a power outage.

A cultivation facility shall maintain compliance with applicable city or county building or structure rules, regulations, or ordinances and any other applicable state laws or rules regarding buildings or structures. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 4, §§ 4-6; 2017, No. 545, § 2; 2017, No. 587, § 1; 2017, No. 594, §§ 1, 2; 2017, No. 639, § 2; 2017, No. 640, § 1; 2017, No. 641, § 1; 2017, No. 642, § 1; 2017, No. 948, § 2; 2017, No. 1023, § 3; 2017, No. 1024, §§ 2, 3; 2017, No. 1100, § 1, 2; 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 1, § 6; 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.), No. 8, § 6; 2019, No. 1004, § 1.]

(2)

None of the owners, board members, or officers of the dispensary or cultivation facility:

(A)

Shall have been convicted of an excluded felony offense;

(B)

Shall have previously been an owner of a dispensary or cultivation facility that has had its license revoked; and

(C)

Shall be under twenty-one (21) years of age.

(4)
(A)

The commission may issue a temporary license to a another natural person in conjunction with a dispensary or a cultivation facility when the natural person whose name is on the license for the dispensary or cultivation facility ceases to be in actual control of the dispensary or cultivation facility.

(B)

The commission shall adopt rules as necessary to provide temporary licenses.

(1)

One (1) cultivation facility; and,

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 4, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Transparency and participation by the public in the development of rules to implement the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016 requires sufficient time to publish rules, allow for comment by the public, and incorporate comments as appropriate;

“(2)

One hundred eighty (180) days from the effective date of the amendment is a reasonable amount of time to comply with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;

“(3)

The fiscal year for the State of Arkansas begins on July 1 of each year and ends on June 30 of each year;

“(4)

It is an unwise expenditure of public resources to enact the necessary appropriations, acts, and establish the necessary fiscal and regulatory provisions for a one-month period beginning on June 1, 2017; and

“(5)

The date of July 1, 2017, is a better effective date for the Medical Marijuana Commission to begin accepting applications.”

Publisher's Notes.

As adopted this section contained two subdivisions (g)(2).

Acts 2017, No. 640, § 1 specifically amended subsection (e) of this section as amended by Acts 2017, No. 4.

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 4 substituted “one hundred eighty (180) days” for “one hundred twenty (120) days” in the introductory language of (d) and (e) and in (f)(1); and substituted “July 1, 2017” for “June 1, 2017” in (g)(1).

The 2017 amendment by No. 545 redesignated former (k) as (k)(1) and substituted “shall” for “may” and “background” for “records” therein; and added (k)(2) through (k)(5).

The 2017 amendment by No. 587 added (g)(4).

The 2017 amendment by No. 594 added (f)(2)(C); and substituted “on June 30 of each calendar year and are renewable on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1” for “one (1) year after the date of issuance” in (n)(1).

The 2017 amendment by No. 639 added (p).

The 2017 amendment by No. 640 rewrote the introductory language of (e)(8); and added subdivisions (e)(8)(A) through (e)(8)(F).

The 2017 amendment by No. 641 added (p) (now (q)).

The 2017 amendment by No. 642 added present (m)(2)(B) and redesignated former (m)(2) as (m)(2)(A); and added (m)(5)(B) and redesignated former (m)(5) as (m)(5)(A).

The 2017 amendment by No. 948 added (p) (now (r)).

The 2017 amendment by Act 1023, in the introductory language of (e)(5), inserted “labeling” and “including without limitation”; and added (e)(5)(A) and (e)(5)(B).

The 2017 amendment by Act 1024 redesignated former (m)(1) as (m)(1)(A); added “but shall not supply . . . and roach clips” in (m)(1)(A); added (m)(1)(B); and added (p) (now (s)).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1100, in (g)(2)(C)(i), substituted “the location of which” for “which location” and inserted “which shall be calculated from the primary entrance of the dispensary to the nearest property boundary of a public or private school, church, or daycare center”; in (g)(2)(C)(ii), substituted “the location of which” for “which location” and added “which shall be calculated from the primary entrance of the cultivation facility to the nearest property boundary of a public or private school, church, or daycare center”; and added (p) (now (t)).

The 2017 (1st Ex. Sess.) amendment by identical acts Nos. 1 and 8 added (p) through (t).

The 2019 amendment added the (g)(2)(C)(i)

(a)

designation; inserted “or facility for individuals with developmental disabilities” twice in (g)(2)(C)(i)

(a)

; and added (g)(2)(C)(i)

(b)

.

Cross References.

Child-proof packaging, § 20-56-304.

§
9. Registration and certification of cultivation facility agents and dispensary agents.

Cultivation facility agents and dispensary agents shall register with the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

The division shall administer and enforce the provisions of this amendment concerning cultivation facility agents and dispensary agents, including without limitation the issuance of a:

Registry identification card to a dispensary agent; and

Registry identification card to a cultivation facility agent.

The division shall adopt rules necessary to:

Carry out the purposes of this amendment; and

Perform its duties under this amendment.

Rules adopted under this section are rules as defined in the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.

Not later than one hundred eighty (180) days after the effective date of this amendment, the division shall adopt rules governing:

The manner in which the division considers applications for and renewals of registry identification cards for dispensary agents and cultivation facility agents;

The form and content of registration and renewal applications for dispensary agents and cultivation facility agents;

Procedures for suspending or terminating the registration of dispensary agents and cultivation facility agents that violate the provisions of this amendment or the rules adopted under this amendment, procedures for appealing penalties, and a schedule of penalties; and

Any other matters necessary to the division's fair, impartial, stringent, and comprehensive administration of its duties under this amendment.

The division shall conduct criminal background checks in order to carry out this section.

The division shall require each applicant for a dispensary agent license or cultivation facility agent license to apply for or authorize the division to obtain state and national criminal background checks to be conducted by the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police and the Federal Bureau of Investigation.

The criminal background checks shall conform to the applicable federal standards and shall include the taking of fingerprints.

The applicant shall authorize the release of the criminal background checks to the division and shall be responsible for the payment of any fee associated with the criminal background checks.

Upon completion of the criminal background checks, the Identification Bureau of the Department of Arkansas State Police shall forward to the division all information obtained concerning the applicant.

Except as provided herein, the division shall issue each dispensary agent and cultivation facility agent a registry identification card within ten (10) days of receipt of:

The person's name, address, and date of birth under this amendment; and

A reasonable fee in an amount established by rule of the division.

The division shall not issue a registry identification card to a dispensary agent or cultivation facility agent who has been convicted of an excluded felony offense.

The division shall conduct a criminal background check as described in subsection (d) of this section of each dispensary agent or cultivation facility agent in order to carry out this provision.

The division shall notify the dispensary or cultivation facility in writing of the reason for denying the registry identification card.

A registry identification card for a dispensary agent or cultivation facility agent shall expire on June 30 of each calendar year and is renewable on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1.

A registry identification card of a dispensary agent or cultivation facility agent expires upon notification to the division by a dispensary or cultivation facility that the person ceases to work at the dispensary or cultivation facility.

The division may charge a reasonable fee as established by rule for the issuance of a new, renewal or replacement registry identification card.

The division may revoke the registry identification card of a dispensary agent or cultivation facility agent who knowingly violates any provision of this amendment, and the cardholder is subject to any other penalties established by law for the violation.

The division may revoke or suspend the dispensary license or cultivation facility license of a dispensary or cultivation facility that the division determines knowingly aided or facilitated a violation of any provision of this amendment, and the licenseholder is subject to any other penalties established in law for the violation.

The division may collect fines or fees for any violation of a rule adopted under this section. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 4, § 7; 2017, No. 545, §§ 3, 4; 2017, No. 594, § 3; 2017, No. 639, § 3.]

A.C.R.C. Notes.

Acts 2017, No. 4, § 1, provided: “Legislative findings.

The General Assembly finds that:

“(1)

Transparency and participation by the public in the development of rules to implement the Arkansas Medical Marijuana Amendment of 2016 requires sufficient time to publish rules, allow for comment by the public, and incorporate comments as appropriate;

“(2)

One hundred eighty (180) days from the effective date of the amendment is a reasonable amount of time to comply with the Arkansas Administrative Procedure Act, § 25-15-201 et seq.;

“(3)

The fiscal year for the State of Arkansas begins on July 1 of each year and ends on June 30 of each year;

“(4)

It is an unwise expenditure of public resources to enact the necessary appropriations, acts, and establish the necessary fiscal and regulatory provisions for a one-month period beginning on June 1, 2017; and

“(5)

The date of July 1, 2017, is a better effective date for the Medical Marijuana Commission to begin accepting applications.”

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 4 substituted “one hundred eighty (180) days” for “one hundred twenty (120) days” in the introductory language of (c).

The 2017 amendment by No. 545 redesignated former (d) as (d)(1) and substituted “shall” for “may” and “background” for “records” therein; added (d)(2) through (d)(5); and, in (f)(2), substituted “shall” for “may” and inserted “as described in subsection (d) of this section”.

The 2017 amendment by No. 594 substituted “on June 30 of each calendar year and is renewable on or before June 30 of each calendar year for the fiscal year beginning July 1” for “one (1) year after the date of issuance” in (g)(1).

The 2017 amendment by No. 639 added (j).

§
10. Dispensary and cultivation facility inspections and requirements.

Dispensaries and cultivation facilities are highly regulated by the state, and a dispensary and cultivation facility is therefore subject to reasonable inspection by the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.

This subsection governs the operations of dispensaries and cultivation facilities.

A dispensary and a cultivation facility shall be an entity incorporated in the State of Arkansas.

A dispensary and cultivation facility shall implement appropriate security measures to deter and prevent unauthorized entrance into areas containing marijuana and the theft of marijuana.

A dispensary and cultivation facility shall have procedures in place to ensure accurate recordkeeping.

Each dispensary shall keep the following records, dating back at least three (3) years:

Records of the disposal of marijuana that is not distributed by the dispensary to qualifying patients; and

A record of each transaction, including the amount of marijuana dispensed, the amount of compensation, and the registry identification number of the qualifying patient or designated caregiver.

Each dispensary and cultivation facility shall:

Conduct an initial comprehensive inventory of all marijuana, including without limitation usable marijuana available for dispensing, mature marijuana plants, and seedlings at each authorized location on the date the dispensary first dispenses usable marijuana or the cultivation facility first cultivates, prepares, manufactures, processes, or packages usable marijuana; and

Conduct a biannual comprehensive inventory of all marijuana, including without limitation usable marijuana available for dispensing, mature marijuana plants, and seedlings at each authorized location.

All cultivation of marijuana shall take place in an enclosed, locked facility.

A qualifying patient or designated caregiver acting on behalf of a qualifying patient shall not be dispensed more than a total of two and one-half ounces (2 ½ oz.) of usable marijuana during a fourteen-day period.

A dispensary or a dispensary agent may not dispense more than a total of two and one-half ounces (2 ½ oz.) of usable marijuana to either a qualifying patient or designated caregiver acting on behalf of a qualifying patient during a fourteen-day period.

Each time a dispensary agent dispenses usable marijuana to a qualifying patient or designated caregiver, he or she shall verify that the dispensing of usable marijuana would not cause the qualifying patient or designated caregiver to receive more usable marijuana than is permitted in a fourteen-day period.

Each time usable marijuana is dispensed, the dispensary agent shall:

Record the date the usable marijuana was dispensed and the amount dispensed; and

Notify the Department of Health in the manner required by the department.

The department shall maintain a database that enables a dispensary to verify that dispensing usable marijuana to a qualifying patient or designated caregiver will not cause the qualifying patient or designated caregiver to exceed the amount allowed by law.

All records shall be kept according to the registry identification number of the qualifying patient or designated caregiver.

It is the specific intent of this Amendment that no qualifying patient or designated caregiver acting on behalf of a qualifying patient be dispensed more than a total of two and one-half ounces (2 ½ oz.) of usable marijuana during a fourteen-day period whether the usable marijuana is dispensed from one or any combination of dispensaries.

The dispensary records with patient information shall be treated as confidential records that are exempt from the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 5, § 3.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment substituted “records that are exempt from the Freedom of Information Act of 1967, § 25-19-101 et seq.” for “medical records” at the end of (b)(9).

§
11. Immunity for dispensaries and cultivation facilities.

A dispensary, cultivation facility, transporter, distributer, or processer is not subject to the following:

Prosecution for the acquisition, possession, cultivation, processing, preparation, manufacture, delivery, transfer, transport, sale, supply, or dispensing of marijuana and related supplies in accordance with the provisions of this amendment and any rule adopted under this amendment;

Inspection, except under § 10 of this amendment or upon a search warrant issued by a court or judicial officer;

Seizure of marijuana, except upon any order issued by a court or judicial officer and with due process of law; or

Imposition of a penalty or denial of a right or privilege, including without limitation imposition of a civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for acting in accordance with this amendment.

A dispensary agent, cultivation facility agent, transporter agent, distributer agent, or processer agent shall not be subject to arrest, prosecution, search, seizure, or penalty in any manner or denied any right or privilege, including without limitation civil penalty or disciplinary action by a business, occupational, or professional licensing board or entity, solely for working for or with a dispensary, cultivation facility, transporter, distributer, or processer to engage in acts permitted by this amendment.

A dispensary agent, cultivation facility agent, or processor agent may possess and manufacture marijuana at the dispensary, cultivation facility, or processer location or locations for which the dispensary agent, cultivation facility agent, or processor agent is registered or when transferring marijuana under this section.

A dispensary agent who is a volunteer may possess and manufacture marijuana at a dispensary location.

A dispensary agent who is a volunteer may not dispense or transport marijuana.

A cultivation facility and processer shall label the marijuana that is moved between the cultivation facility or processer and a dispensary, other cultivation facility, or processer with a trip ticket that identifies the cultivation facility by identification number, the time, date, origin, and destination of the marijuana being transported, and the amount and form of marijuana that is being transported.

A transporter agent or distributer agent may possess marijuana at any location while the transporter agent or distributor agent is transferring marijuana from a dispensary, cultivation facility, or processer to another dispensary, cultivation facility, or processor.

Importation of seeds, cuttings, clones, or plants by a dispensary or cultivation facility shall not be prosecuted in the courts of this state. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 642, § 2; 2017, No. 1022, § 1.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment by No. 642 inserted “transporter, distributer, or processer” in the introductory language of (a); in (b)(1), inserted “transporter agent, distributer agent, or processer agent” and “transporter, distributer, or processer”; in (b)(2)(A), inserted “or processor agent” twice and “or processer”; in (b)(3), inserted “and processer” and “or processer” twice; and added (b)(4).

The 2017 amendment by No. 1022 added (c).

§
12. Prohibitions for dispensaries.

Except as provided in § 3 of this amendment and subdivision (a)(2) of this section, a dispensary may not dispense, deliver, or otherwise transfer marijuana to a person other than a qualifying patient or designated caregiver.

A dispensary may transfer marijuana to a transporter, distributer, or processer to operate to extent of the license of the transporter, distributer, or processer.

Except as provided in § 3 of this amendment, the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division shall immediately revoke the registry identification card of a dispensary agent who has dispensed, delivered, or otherwise transferred marijuana to a person other than a qualifying patient or designated caregiver, and that dispensary agent shall be disqualified from serving as a dispensary agent.

A dispensary employing a dispensary agent found to violate subdivision (b)(1) of this section is not subject to penalties, including without limitation the revocation of its license, for the actions of a dispensary agent unless the dispensary knowingly aided or facilitated the violation. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 642, § 2.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment redesignated (a) as (a)(1) and added (a)(2); and inserted “and subdivision (a)(2) of this section” in (a)(1).

§
13. Prohibitions for cultivation facilities.

A cultivation facility may sell marijuana plants, seeds, and usable marijuana only to a dispensary, other cultivation facility, or processer.

A cultivation facility may employ a transporter or a distributor to transfer marijuana from the cultivation facility to a dispensary, other cultivation facility, or processer. [As amended by Acts 2017, No. 642, § 2.]

Legislative Amendments.

The 2017 amendment designated the existing language as (a), and added (b); and added “or processer” in (a).

§
14. Local regulation.

This amendment does not prohibit a city, incorporated town, or county of this state from enacting reasonable zoning regulations applicable to dispensaries or cultivation facilities, provided that those zoning regulations are the same as those for a licensed retail pharmacy.

This section does not allow a city, incorporated town, or county to prohibit the operation of any dispensaries or cultivation facilities in the city, incorporated town, or county unless such a prohibition is approved at an election under Article 5, § 1, of this constitution.

§
15. Prohibited conduct for physicians.

A physician shall not:

Accept, solicit, or offer any form of pecuniary remuneration from or to a dispensary or cultivation facility provided however, that this does not prohibit a physician who is also a qualifying patient from purchasing usable marijuana from a dispensary;

Offer a discount or other thing of value to a qualifying patient who uses or agrees to use a particular dispensary;

Examine a patient for purposes of diagnosing a qualifying medical condition at a dispensary; or

Hold an economic interest in a dispensary or cultivation facility if the physician certifies the qualifying medical condition of a patient for medical use of marijuana.